Utah statutes.
31A-22-808.   Premiums and refunds.
(1)  Each policy, certificate, or statement of insurance shall provide that in
the event of termination of the insurance prior to the scheduled maturity date
of the indebtedness, any refund of an amount paid by the debtor for insurance
shall be paid or credited promptly to the person entitled to it.  The formula
used in computing the refund shall be filed with and approved by the
commissioner under Chapter 21, Part 2, Approval of Forms.  No refund is
required if it would be less than $5.
(2)  If a creditor requires a debtor to make any payment for credit life or
credit accident and health insurance and an individual policy, certificate, or
statement of insurance is not issued, the creditor shall immediately give
written notice to the debtor and credit the account.
(3)  The amount charged the debtor for credit life or accident and health
insurance may not exceed the premiums charged by the insurer as computed at
the time the charge to the debtor is determined.
